District of Columbia statutes.
38-1803.15

Authorization of appropriations.

There are authorized to be appropriated $2,000,000 for fiscal year 1997 to carry out this part. Such funds shall remain available until expended.

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [256], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2315
1981 Ed., § 31-2853.35.